Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 40. Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center Corporation

154.40-010.
Definitions for KRS 154.40-010 to 154.40-060.

As used in KRS 154.40-010 to 154.40-060, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Board” means the board of directors of the Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center Corporation;

“Center” means the Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center; and

“Corporation” means the Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center Corporation.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 27, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

154.40-020.
Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center Corporation.

The Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center Corporation is created and established as an independent, de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth that shall be a public body corporate and politic. The corporation shall develop, operate, and manage the Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center funded by 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 549, Part II, Section F, Item 1(e) and Part II, Section S, Item 2(a)236. The corporation shall be attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet for administrative purposes.

The corporation shall be a participating agency in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System. Its employees shall be considered state employees for the purpose of participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System and shall be entitled to the requirements and benefits provided to other system participants.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 27, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2006, ch. 152, § 12, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 40, effective June 25, 2009.

154.40-030.
Board of directors.

The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of seven (7) members appointed as follows:

Three (3) members appointed by the Governor;

Two (2) members appointed by the county judge/executive of Pike County; and

Two (2) members appointed by the mayor of Pikeville.

A member may be removed by his or her appointing authority as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, for misfeasance or malfeasance and after being afforded notice, an opportunity for a hearing under KRS Chapter 13B, and a finding of facts. A copy of charges, transcripts of the records of hearings, and findings of fact shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The reimbursement shall be in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

Initial appointments shall be for a term expiring November 1, 2003. Thereafter, members shall serve terms of four (4) years beginning November 1, 2003. After a membership term expires, members shall serve until new members are appointed to replace them.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 27, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2011, ch. 85, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

154.40-040.
Powers of board — Executive director.

The board may develop articles of incorporation and appropriate documentation to establish its existence as a corporation under KRS 58.180.

A quorum of the board shall consist of four (4) members, with a majority of members present authorized to act upon any matter legally before the corporation.

The board may enact bylaws concerning the election of officers and other administrative procedures it deems necessary.

The board may adopt administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to govern the operation, maintenance, or use of property under its custody and control.

Minutes and records of all meetings of the board shall be kept, and all official actions shall be recorded.

The board may establish an executive committee from among its membership with full authority to act between meetings of the board to the extent delegated by vote of a majority of the members of the board.

The board may employ a full-time executive director who shall hold office at its pleasure.

The executive director shall act under the direction of the board in employing necessary staff to perform the corporation’s duties and exercise its powers.

The executive director shall keep all minutes, records, and orders of the corporation and shall be responsible for the preservation of all the documents, which shall be public records under KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 27, § 4, effective June 21, 2001.

154.40-050.
Powers and duties of corporation.

The Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center Corporation shall have the following powers and duties:

The corporation shall supervise the design, construction, and operation of the Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center and shall provide all management functions for the facility and for any other property acquired or leased in accordance with its powers established in this section.

The corporation shall promote the growth and development of the convention, trade, tourism, hotel, restaurant, and entertainment industry in eastern Kentucky, Pike County, and the Commonwealth through utilization of the center.

The corporation shall have the exclusive control of all exhibitions, performances, and concessions in the Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center. The corporation shall have a prior lien upon the property of any private exhibitor, concessionaire, or other person holding an exhibition or performance or operating a concession in the center and may sell the property upon ten (10) days’ notice to satisfy any indebtedness.

The corporation shall participate with local hotels and the travel industry to develop tourist packages and additional services to attract conferences and conventions to the region.

The corporation may take, acquire, and hold property, and all interests therein, by deed, purchase, gift, devise, bequest, or lease or by transfer from the State Properties and Buildings Commission and may dispose of any property so acquired in any manner provided by law.

The corporation may levy a surcharge on tickets for functions held within the center to contribute to operating revenue.

The corporation may sue and be sued and maintain and defend legal actions in its corporate name.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 27, § 5, effective June 21, 2001.

154.40-060.
Use of revenues and funds — Annual audit.

All revenues derived by the corporation from the use of Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center, all contributions to the center from other sources, and any revenues derived by the corporation from any other source shall be used solely for the expenses of the center, including payment on debt; the cost of management and operation of its facilities; the creation of an adequate reserve for repair, replacement, debt service, and capital improvements; the procurement of insurance; and promotional activities.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall conduct an annual audit of all funds of the corporation and its affiliated entities, if any, and report annually to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 27, § 6, effective June 21, 2001.